Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2404
Misdemeanor cases; fines and costs; judgment; levy; commitment.

In all cases of misdemeanor in which courts or magistrates shall have power to fine any offender, and shall render judgment for such fine, it shall be lawful to issue executions for the same, with the costs taxed against the offender, to be levied on the goods and chattels of any such offender, and, for want of the same, upon the body of the offender, who shall, following a determination that the offender has the financial ability to pay such fine pursuant to section 29-2412, be committed to the jail of the proper county until the fine and costs be paid, or secured to be paid, or the offender be otherwise discharged according to law.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 521, p. 837;

R.S.1913, § 9191;

C.S.1922, § 10198;

C.S.1929, § 29-2404;

R.S.1943, § 29-2404;

Laws 2017, LB259, § 10.

Where defendant was sentenced to pay fine and gave supersedeas bond, he cannot be committed except for want of goods and chattels out of which to meet demands of execution. State v. Swedland, 114 Neb. 280, 207 N.W. 29 (1926).